Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-2422.01
Licensee; asset management company
client; exempt from certain requirements.

(1) A licensee shall be exempt from the requirements of
subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of section 76-2417 and subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of section
76-2418 if the client to whom the written offer is required to be presented
by such licensee is an asset management company.

(2) A licensee shall
be exempt from the provision contained in subsection (2) of section 76-2422
that requires the inclusion of specific duties and responsibilities specified
in section 76-2417 in the written agreement if the client is an asset management
company.

Laws 2011, LB25, § 10.